Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-818
Order or judgment of injunction; contents.

If an order or judgment of injunction be entered, such order or judgment shall contain either a provision directing the person to surrender to the sheriff or police the work, material, conduct or live performance which has been adjudicated to be obscene for seizure and impoundment by the court or to destroy or remove the same from the state. No order or judgment directing such firm, person, corporation or other legal entity to destroy or to remove such work, material, conduct or live performance from the state under such supervision as the court may direct shall issue until after a final judgment has been made as the result of an appeal or in the absence of an appeal. The court shall require satisfactory proof of compliance with such order.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 174.